Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Water Resources Department shall establish a program for the
purpose of replacing, repairing or deepening domestic personal use wells that  are affected
by declining ground water levels  resulting from overallocation of ground water within the
Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area of Concern.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) May  enter into contracts, intergovernmental agreements or other arrangements with
public or private entities in order to work collaboratively  to undertake the actions described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(b) May award grants for costs related to the replacement, repair or deepening of  the
wells or pay the cost of direct services  of a water well constructor licensed under ORS
537.747 to perform work needed to replace, repair or deepen the wells;
(c) Shall develop a process for applying for a grant or payment;
(d) May require a grantee or recipient  of a payment to report to the department on the
use of the funds;
(e) Shall biennially review the program  and report to the Water Resources Commission
on program implementation and outcomes to assess to what  extent the purpose described in
subsection (1) of this section is being achieved; and
(f) Shall, based on the  report, modify the program as necessary to better achieve the
purpose described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A grant or payment described in subsection (2)(b) of this section may provide:
(a) Up to 75 percent of the total cost of replacing, repairing or deepening the well, not
to exceed $10,000 per well for replacement, repair or deepening; and
(b) If determined by the department to be  necessary as part of replacing a well, up to
$3,500 for the cost of abandoning the replaced well.
(4) In reviewing applications for a grant or payment, the department shall:
(a) Prioritize grants or payments for wells owned by or serving persons  of lower or
moderate income;
(b) Prioritize grants or payments for wells based on the severity  of changes and declines
in ground water, as determined by the department; and
(c) Consider other criteria determined by the department to be appropriate.
(5) To be eligible for funding, wells must:
Enrolled House Bill 3092 (HB 3092-A) Page 1
(a) Be domestic  personal use wells affected by declining ground water levels within the
Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area of Concern;
(b) Have served domestic personal use at a residence existing as of April 15, 2016; and
(c) Meet other criteria determined by the department.
(6) If replacement of a well is funded in whole or in part under  the program, the replaced
well must be abandoned.
(7) The Water Resources Commission may adopt rules  to implement the program. The
commission shall, for purposes of the program,  adopt by rule a definition for the term
“Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area of  Concern” or maintain in rule a definition for
the term that the commission adopted before the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Water Resources  Department shall make the initial report required by
section 1 (2)(e) of this 2021 Act on or before January 1, 2024.
SECTION 3. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from
the General Fund, the Domestic Well Remediation Fund. Interest earned by the Domestic
Well Remediation Fund shall be credited to the  fund. All moneys in the Domestic Well Re-
mediation Fund are continuously appropriated to the Water Resources Department to  carry
out the purposes described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Domestic Well Remediation Fund shall consist of all moneys  credited to the fund,
including moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the Water Resources  Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000 for deposit into  the
Domestic Well Remediation Fund established in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3092 (HB 3092-A) Page 2